test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k7_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    sandur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sandur
    sandur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: sand
    sandur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: sandi
    sandur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: sands
    sandur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: sandar
    sandur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: sandar
    sandur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: sondum
    sandur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: sanda
    sandur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: sandurin
    sandur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: sandin
    sandur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: sandinum
    sandur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: sandsins
    sandur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: sandarnir
    sandur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: sandarnar
    sandur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: sondunum
    sandur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: sandanna
